California, session 20252026, AB1235.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10708 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:10708. (a) When, in the opinion of the trustees, the best interests of the California State University dictate, the trustees may enter into an agreement with a contractor to provide all or significant portions of the design services and construction of a project under this chapter. The contractor shall design the project pursuant to the scope of services set forth in the request for proposals, build the project, and present the completed project to the trustees for their approval and acceptance.(b) Work under this section shall be carried out by a contractor chosen by a competitive bidding process that employs selection criteria in addition to cost. Any design work performed pursuant to this section shall be prepared and signed by an architect certificated pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.(c) When the design of portions of the project permits the selection of subcontractors, the contractor shall competitively bid those portions. The contractor shall provide to the trustees a list of subcontractors whose work is in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the total project cost as soon as the subcontractors are identified. Once listed, the subcontractors shall have the rights provided in the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1).(d) (1) A contractor shall not be prequalified for, shortlisted for, or awarded a contract pursuant to this section unless the contractor provides an enforceable commitment to the trustees that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:(A) The trustees have entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce and the contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the trustees prior to January 1, 2026. January 1, 2027.(C) The contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.(D) Notwitstanding any other law, the project or contract is for the development of housing, including dormitories.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.